District of Columbia statutes.
34-211

“Joint rates” defined.

The term “joint rates” when used in this subtitle with reference to street railways shall be taken to mean rates between unrelated lines in effect on March 4, 1913, under then existing law or under contract, or which may thereafter be specifically authorized by law.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 974, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1

History

This section is referenced in § 2-1215.15.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 43-207.
1973 Ed., § 43-107.

Prior Codifications